Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
Article 9 Retail Telecommunications Services

Effective date.

This article became effective June 4, 2010.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1135, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “It is the intent of the General Assembly to:

“(1) Update and modernize Georgia’s telecommunications laws to encourage competition and bring about lower prices and better services for the consumer;

“(2) Make Georgia a more attractive place for telecommunications investment and encourage the deployment of advanced technologies;

“(3) Create and preserve jobs for Georgia workers; and

“(4) Reduce the subsidies paid by Georgia consumers.

“It is not the intent of the General Assembly to impose any fee or other charge on Georgia consumers.”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1135, § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known as and may be cited as the ‘Telecom Jobs and Investment Act.’”

46-5-250.
Retail telecommunications service defined.

As used in this article, the term “retail telecommunications service” means the offering of two-way interactive communications for a fee directly to end users. Such term does not include wireless service as defined in paragraph (3) of Code Section 46-5-221 nor does it include the obligations of an incumbent local exchange carrier, as defined by 47 U.S.C. Section 251, pursuant to 47 U.S.C. Sections 251, 252, and 271 and the Federal Communications Commission’s rules and regulations implementing such sections.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-5-250

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 1135, § 6/HB 168.

46-5-251.
Authority of Public Service Commission limited.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law in this chapter or Chapter 2 of this title except the provisions of Code Section 46-5-252 and the complaint process set forth in subsection (a) of the Code Section 46-5-166, the commission shall not have any jurisdiction, right, power, authority, or duty to impose or enforce any requirement, regulation, or rule relating to the setting of rates or terms and conditions for the offering of retail telecommunications service by a telecommunications company not subject to rate of return regulation.

This Code section shall not be construed to affect:

State laws of general applicability to all businesses, including, without limitation, consumer protection laws, and laws relating to restraint of trade;

Any authority of the commission with regard to consumer complaints; or

Any authority of the commission to act in accordance with federal laws or regulations of the Federal Communications Commission, including, without limitation, jurisdiction granted to set rates, terms, and conditions for access to unbundled network elements, intercarrier compensation, and to arbitrate and enforce interconnection agreements.

Except as otherwise expressly provided in this Code section, nothing in this Code section shall be construed to restrict or expand any other authority or jurisdiction of the commission.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-5-251

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 1135, § 6/HB 168; Ga. L. 2021, p. 922, § 46/HB 497.

The 2021 amendment,

effective May 10, 2021, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “commission” for “Public Service Commission” in subsection (a), paragraphs (b)(2) and (b)(3), and subsection (c).

46-5-252.
Prohibition against passing cost of compliance on to consumers.

No company providing retail telecommunications service shall impose a separate line item or surcharge on customers’ bills to recover any costs of complying with any state law or regulations without first submitting to the commission the methodology and data used by such company for approval by the commission; provided, however, that such a company shall not be required to submit for approval separate line items or surcharges that are specifically authorized or required by federal or state law. No fines or penalties imposed by the commission shall be considered as a cost of complying with a state law or regulation or included in any such separate line item or surcharge, or as a portion thereof.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-5-252

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 1135, § 6/HB 168; Ga. L. 2021, p. 922, § 46/HB 497.

The 2021 amendment,

effective May 10, 2021, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “commission” for “Public Service Commission” twice in this Code section.